Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 2. Payment of Wages.

Sec. 23.10.040.
Payment of wages in state.

Except as otherwise provided by AS

37.25.050

, an employer of labor performing services in this state shall pay the wages or other compensation for the services with lawful money of the United States or with negotiable checks, drafts, or orders payable upon presentation without discount by a bank or depository inside the state.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 28 SLA 1971.]

[Repealed, § 2 ch 28 SLA 1971.]

A person who violates a provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 43-2-12 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1967; am §§ 1, 2 ch 28 SLA 1971; am § 10 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Master and Servant, § 82.

51B C.J.S., Labor Relations, § 1179.

Sec. 23.10.043.
Deposit of wages.

An employer may not deposit wages due or to become due or an advance on wages to be earned in an account in a bank, savings and loan association, or credit union unless the employee has voluntarily authorized the deposit.
All deposits under this section shall be in a bank, savings and loan association, or credit union of the employee’s choice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 23.10.040(e). Renumbered in 1976.

Sec. 23.10.045.
Payments into benefit fund.

If an employer agrees with an employee to make payments to a fund for the benefit of the employees, including a fund for medical, health, hospital, welfare, and pension benefits or any of them, or has entered into a collective bargaining agreement providing for these payments, the employer may not without just cause fail to make the payments required by the terms of the agreement.

Each violation of this section is a separate offense and a person found guilty of a violation is punishable in accordance with the schedule of punishment set out in AS

23.10.415

.

History.

(§ 43-2-13 ACLA 1949; added by § 1 ch 23 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 1959; am § 10 ch 2 SLA 1964; am § 18 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), deleted “but not limited to” following “benefit of the employees, including”.

Sec. 23.10.047.
Employee’s lien.

If an employer agrees with an employee or group of employees to make payment to a medical, health, hospital, welfare, or pension fund or such other fund for the benefit of the employees, or has entered into a collective bargaining agreement providing for the payments, but fails to make the payments when due, a lien is created in favor of each affected employee on the earnings of the employer and on all property of the employer used in the operation of the employer’s business to the extent of the money, plus penalties due to be paid on the employee’s behalf to qualify the employee for participation in the fund and for expenses incurred by the employee for which the employee would have been entitled to reimbursement under the fund if the required payments had been made.

The lien claimant, a representative of the claimant, or the trustee of the fund on behalf of the claimant must record a notice of claim within 60 days after the employer’s payment is due with the recorder of the recording district in which the employer’s place of business is located or in which the claimant resides. The notice contains

the name of employee;

the name of the employer and the name of the person employing the claimant if known;

a statement of the pertinent terms and conditions of the employee benefit plan;

the date when the payments are due and were to have been paid; and

a statement of the demand including the amounts due to the claimant if expenses have been incurred.

The notice of claim of lien is served on the employer in the same manner as a summons and complaint in civil actions or mailed to the employer by registered mail.

The lien created by the recording of the notice of claim of lien is enforced within the same time and in the same manner as a mechanic’s lien is foreclosed if the lien is on real property, or as a chattel lien is enforced if the lien is on personal property. The court may allow, as part of the costs of the action, the recording fees for the notice of claim, reasonable attorney’s fees, and court costs.

The lien created under (a) of this section is preferred and superior to an encumbrance that attaches after the employer’s payments became due, and is also preferred and superior to an encumbrance that has attached previously, but that was not recorded and of which the lien claimant had no notice.

History.

(§ 43-2-14 ACLA 1949; added by § 1 ch 145 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsections (b), (d), and (e) of this section in 1988 under § 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.